Washington statutes.
RCW 7.16.270

Service of writ.

The writ must be served in the same manner as a summons in a civil action, except when otherwise expressly directed by order of the court. Service upon a majority of the members of any board or body is service upon the board or body, whether at the time of the service the board or body was in session or not.

[ 1895 c 65 s 27; RRS s 1025.]